Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5812.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14o. (1) The department shall not seek, apply for, accept, or renew a waiver for work requirements under 7 USC 2015(o)(4) without first obtaining specific authorization from the legislature. (2) The department shall not exercise this state's option to provide exemptions from the work requirement under 7 USC 2015(o)(6)(F). This subsection must not be construed to limit the application of good cause exemptions for temporary absence from employment as provided in 7 CFR 273.24(b)(2).